North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 1. Definitions.

§ 57D-9-01.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the following definitions apply in this Article:

Articles of organization and conversion. — The document filed by the Secretary of State under

G.S. 57D-9-22

for the purpose of converting an eligible entity into an LLC.

Converting entity. — An eligible entity that converts into another eligible entity pursuant to Part 2 or Part 3 of this Article 9.

Converting LLC. — A converting entity that is an LLC.

Eligible entity. — A corporation, including a professional corporation as defined in

G.S. 55B-2

and a foreign professional corporation defined in

G.S. 55B-16

, a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, a limited liability company, a domestic or foreign limited partnership, a registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-32

, or any other partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-36

, whether or not formed under the laws of this State.

Merging entity. — An eligible entity that is a party to a merger.

Merging LLC. — A merging entity that is an LLC.

Surviving entity. — The eligible entity into which a converting entity converts or into which an eligible entity is merged.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-9-02 through 57D-9-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.